Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 5. Default.
Sec. 45.12.528.
Lessor’s damages for nonacceptance, failure to pay, repudiation, or other default.

Except as otherwise provided with respect to damages liquidated in the lease agreement under AS

45.12.504

or otherwise determined under agreement of the parties under AS

45.01.302

and AS

45.12.503

, if a lessor elects to retain the goods or a lessor elects to dispose of the goods and the disposition is by lease agreement that for any reason does not qualify for treatment under AS

45.12.527(b)

, or is by sale or otherwise, the lessor may recover from the lessee as damages for a default described in AS

45.12.523(a)

or (c)(1), or, if agreed, for other default of the lessee

accrued and unpaid rent as of the date of default if the lessee has never taken possession of the goods, or, if the lessee has taken possession of the goods, as of the date the lessor repossesses the goods or an earlier date on which the lessee makes a tender of the goods to the lessor;

the present value as of the date determined under (1) of this subsection of the total rent for the then remaining lease term of the original lease agreement minus the present value as of the same date of the market rent at the place where the goods are located, computed for the same lease term; and

incidental damages allowed under AS

45.12.530

, less expenses saved in consequence of the lessee’s default.

If the measure of damages provided in (a) of this section is inadequate to put a lessor in as good a position as performance would have, the measure of damages is the present value of the profit, including reasonable overhead, the lessor would have made from full performance by the lessee, together with any incidental damages allowed under AS

45.12.530

, due allowance for costs reasonably incurred, and due credit for payments or proceeds of disposition.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993; am § 92 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “AS

45.01.302

” for “AS 45.01.102(c)”; in (a)(3), deleted “any” preceding “incidental damages allowed”.

Sec. 45.12.529.
Lessor’s action for the rent.

After default, by the lessee under the lease contract, of the type described in AS

45.12.523(a)

or (c)(1) or, if agreed, after other default by the lessee, if the lessor complies with (b) of this section, the lessor may recover from the lessee as damages

for goods accepted by the lessee and not repossessed by or tendered to the lessor, and for conforming goods lost or damaged within a commercially reasonable time after risk of loss passes to the lessee under AS

45.12.219

accrued and unpaid rent as of the date of entry of judgment in favor of the lessor;

the present value as of the same date of the rent for the then remaining lease term of the lease agreement; and

any incidental damages allowed under AS

45.12.530

, less expenses saved in consequence of the lessee’s default; and

for goods identified to the lease contract if the lessor is unable after reasonable effort to dispose of them at a reasonable price or the circumstances reasonably indicate that effort will be unavailing

accrued and unpaid rent as of the date of entry of judgment in favor of the lessor;

the present value as of the same date of the rent for the then remaining lease term of the lease agreement; and

any incidental damages allowed under AS

45.12.530

, less expenses saved in consequence of the lessee’s default.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, the lessor shall hold for the lessee for the remaining lease term of the lease agreement any goods that have been identified to the lease contract and are in the lessor’s control.

The lessor may dispose of the goods at any time before collection of the judgment for damages obtained under (a) of this section. If the disposition is before the end of the remaining lease term of the lease agreement, the lessor’s recovery against the lessee for damages will be governed by AS

45.12.527

or

45.12.528

, and the lessor will cause an appropriate credit to be provided against a judgment for damages to the extent that the amount of the judgment exceeds the recovery available under AS

45.12.527

or

45.12.528

.

Payment of the judgment for damages obtained under (a) of this section entitles the lessee to the use and possession of the goods not then disposed of for the remaining lease term of and in accordance with the lease agreement.

After default, by the lessee under the lease contract, of the type described in AS

45.12.523(a)

or (c)(1) or, if agreed, after other default by the lessee, a lessor who is held not entitled to rent under this section shall nevertheless be awarded damages for nonacceptance under AS

45.12.527

or

45.12.528

.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.12.530.
Lessor’s incidental damages.

Incidental damages to an aggrieved lessor include commercially reasonable charges, expenses, or commissions incurred in stopping delivery, in the transportation, care, and custody of goods after the lessee’s default, in connection with return or disposition of the goods, or otherwise resulting from the default.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.12.531.
Standing to sue third parties for injury to goods.

If a third party so deals with goods that have been identified to a lease contract as to cause actionable injury to a party to the lease contract

the lessor has a right of action against the third party; and

the lessee also has a right of action against the third party if the lessee

has a security interest in the goods;

has an insurable interest in the goods; or

bears the risk of loss under the lease contract or has since the injury assumed that risk as against the lessor and the goods have been converted or destroyed.

If at the time of the injury the party plaintiff did not bear the risk of loss as against the other party to the lease contract and there is no arrangement between them for disposition of the recovery, the plaintiff’s suit or settlement, subject to the plaintiff’s own interest, is as a fiduciary for the other party to the lease contract.

Either party with the consent of the other may sue for the benefit of whom it may concern.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.12.532.
Lessor’s rights regarding residual interest.

In addition to any other recovery permitted by this chapter or other law, the lessor may recover from the lessee an amount that will fully compensate the lessor for any loss of or damage to the lessor’s residual interest in the goods caused by the default of the lessee.

History.

(§ 125 ch 35 SLA 1993)